New York, session 2025-2026, A3499.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph (e) of subdivision 2 of section 212 of the judi- 2 ciary law, as amended by chapter 323 of the laws of 1987, the closing 3 paragraph as amended by chapter 349 of the laws of 1995, is amended to 4 read as follows: 5 (e) Prepare forms and compile and publish data on family offenses as 6 defined in subdivision one of section eight hundred twelve of the family 7 court act or subdivision one of section 530.11 of the criminal procedure 8 law, and proceedings or actions involving family offenses in all 9 courts[,] in the unified court system, and require reporting of such 10 data by all courts, including town and village courts to the greatest 11 extent practicable, including but not limited to the following informa- 12 tion: 13 (i) the offense alleged; 14 (ii) the relationship of the alleged offender to the petitioner or 15 complainant; 16 (iii) the court where the action or proceeding was instituted; 17 (iv) the disposition; and 18 (v) in the case of dismissal, the reasons therefor. 19 In executing this requirement, the chief administrator may adopt rules 20 requiring appropriate law enforcement or criminal justice agencies to 21 identify actions and proceedings involving family offenses and, with 22 respect to such actions and proceedings, to report, in such form and EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01331-05-5 A. 3499--A 2 1 manner as the chief administrator shall prescribe, the information spec- 2 ified herein. 3 The chief administrator of the courts shall adopt rules to facilitate 4 record sharing and other communication among [the supreme, criminal and 5 family] all courts in the unified court system, including town and 6 village courts, subject to applicable provisions of the domestic 7 relations law, criminal procedure law and the family court act pertain- 8 ing to the confidentiality, expungement and sealing of records, where 9 such courts exercise concurrent jurisdiction over family offense 10 proceedings or proceedings involving orders of protection. 11 § 2. The opening paragraphs of paragraphs (u-1) and (v-1) of subdivi- 12 sion 2 of section 212 of the judiciary law, as added by chapter 102 of 13 the laws of 2020, are amended to read as follows: 14 Compile and publish data on misdemeanor offenses in all courts in the 15 unified court system, and require reporting of such data by all courts, 16 including town and village courts, disaggregated by county, and by indi- 17 vidual court, including the following information: 18 Compile and publish data on violations, to the greatest extent practi- 19 cable, in all courts in the unified court system, and require reporting 20 of such data by all courts, including town and village courts, disaggre- 21 gated by county, and by individual court, including the following infor- 22 mation: 23 § 3. Paragraph (w-1) of subdivision 2 of section 212 of the judiciary 24 law, as added by chapter 102 of the laws of 2020, is amended to read as 25 follows: 26 (w-1) The chief administrator shall include the information required 27 by paragraphs (u-1) [and], (v-1), and (ff) of this subdivision in the 28 annual report submitted to the legislature and the governor pursuant to 29 paragraph (j) of subdivision one of this section. The chief administra- 30 tor shall also make the information required by paragraphs (u-1) [and], 31 (v-1), and (ff) of this subdivision available to the public by posting 32 it on the website of the office of court administration and shall update 33 such information on a monthly basis. The information shall be posted in 34 alphanumeric form that can be digitally transmitted or processed and not 35 in portable document format or scanned copies of original documents. 36 § 4. Subdivision 2 of section 212 of the judiciary law is amended by 37 adding two new paragraphs (ff) and (gg) to read as follows: 38 (ff) Prepare forms and compile and publish data on landlord-initiated 39 eviction filings, proceedings or actions and on tenant-initiated 40 filings, proceedings, or actions in all courts in the unified court 41 system, and require reporting of such data by all courts, including town 42 and village courts to the greatest extent practicable, disaggregated by 43 county, and by individual court, including but not limited to the 44 following information: 45 (i) in the case of landlord-initiated eviction filings, proceedings, 46 or actions, the total number in each court by month, categorized by 47 whether nonpayment or holdover, the amount of the money judgment 48 entered, if any, and whether the landlord or tenant was represented by 49 an attorney; 50 (ii) in the case of tenant-initiated filings, proceedings, or actions, 51 the total number in each court by month categorized by whether seeking 52 judgment directing repairs, restoration to occupancy after an unlawful 53 eviction, or other relief, and whether the landlord or tenant was 54 represented by an attorney; 55 (iii) the court where the action or proceeding was instituted; A. 3499--A 3 1 (iv) the disposition of the proceeding, including whether a judgment 2 and warrant of eviction was issued, repairs, restoration to occupancy, 3 or other relief ordered, and the amount of the money judgment entered, 4 if any; and 5 (v) in the case of dismissal, the reasons therefor. 6 (gg) In addition to the data reporting required under paragraphs (e), 7 (u-1), (v-1), (w-1), and (ff) of this subdivision, wherever the chief 8 administrator is required to compile, report, and make other court data 9 publicly available, or wherever the chief administrator opts to require 10 such collection, reporting, and public availability of data, this shall 11 include data from all courts in the unified court system, including town 12 and village courts to the greatest extent practicable, disaggregated by 13 county and by individual court. 14 § 5. This act shall take effect two years after it shall have become a 15 law.